Utah statutes.
59-2-1107.   Indigent persons -- Amount of abatement.
The county may remit or abate the taxes of any poor person meeting the
requirements of Section 59-2-1109 in an amount not exceeding the lesser of:
(1)  the amount provided as a homeowner's credit for the lowest household
income bracket under Section 59-2-1208; or
(2)  50% of the total tax levied for the current year.
